Mississippi, session 2026, HB1541.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 97-3-5, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 97-3-5.  A person who manufactures, markets, mails, distributes, transports, delivers, sells, lends, gives away, or in any manner exhibits, or offers to manufacture, market, mail, distribute, transport, deliver, sell, lend, or give away, or has in his or her possession with intent to manufacture, market, mail, distribute, transport, deliver, sell, lend, or give away, or advertises or offers for sale, loan or distribution any instrument or article, or any drug or medicine, for causing * * *unlawful an abortion that is prohibited in this state; or who writes or prints, or causes to be written or printed, a card, circular, pamphlet, advertisement, or notice of any kind, or gives information orally, stating when, where, how, of whom, or by what means such instrument, article or medicine can be purchased or obtained, or who manufactures any such instrument, article or medicine, is guilty of a * * *misdemeanor felony, and, * * *on upon conviction, shall be punished by a fine not less than * * *Twenty‑five Dollars ($25.00) One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) nor more than * * *Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00) Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00), and by imprisonment in the * * *county jail not exceeding three (3) months custody of the Department of Corrections for not less than two (2) years nor more than five (5) years, or both. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.